closure.aff
SFX V_c2  uocere  otti/e         cuocere
SFX V_c2  uocere  otte/e         cuocere
SFX V_c2  ompere  uppi           rompere
SFX V_c2  ompere  uppe           rompere
SFX V_c2  ompere  uppero         rompere
SFX V_c2  ompere  otto/e         rompere
SFX V_c2  ompere  otta/e         rompere
SFX V_c2  ompere  otti/e         rompere
SFX V_c2  ompere  otte/e         rompere
SFX V_c2   otere  osso            potere
SFX V_c2   otere  uoi             potere
SFX V_c2   otere  uò              potere
SFX V_c2   otere  ossiamo/e       potere
SFX V_c2   otere  ossono          potere
SFX V_c2   otere  otrò            potere
SFX V_c2   otere  otrai           potere
SFX V_c2   otere  otrà            potere
SFX V_c2   otere  otremo          potere
SFX V_c2   otere  otrete          potere
SFX V_c2   otere  otranno         potere
SFX V_c2   otere  otrei           potere
SFX V_c2   otere  otresti         potere
SFX V_c2   otere  otrebbe         potere
SFX V_c2   otere  otremmo         potere
SFX V_c2   otere  otreste         potere
SFX V_c2   otere  otrebbero       potere
SFX V_c2   otere  ossa/e          potere
SFX V_c2   otere  ossiate/e       potere
SFX V_c2   otere  ossano          potere
SFX V_c2    urre  ucere/V          durre
SFX V_c2   ucere  ussi            ducere
SFX V_c2   ucere  usse            ducere
SFX V_c2   ucere  ussero          ducere
SFX V_c2   ucere  urrò            ducere
SFX V_c2   ucere  urrai           ducere
SFX V_c2   ucere  urrà            ducere
SFX V_c2   ucere  urremo          ducere
SFX V_c2   ucere  urrete          ducere
SFX V_c2   ucere  urranno         ducere
SFX V_c2   ucere  urrei           ducere
SFX V_c2   ucere  urresti         ducere
SFX V_c2   ucere  urrebbe         ducere
SFX V_c2   ucere  urremmo         ducere
SFX V_c2   ucere  urreste         ducere
SFX V_c2   ucere  urrebbero       ducere
SFX V_c2   ucere  otto/e          ducere
SFX V_c2   ucere  otta/e          ducere
SFX V_c2   ucere  otti/e          ducere
SFX V_c2   ucere  otte/e          ducere
SFX V_c2     ere  evere/V           bere
SFX V_c2   evere  evvi            bevere
SFX V_c2   evere  evve            bevere
SFX V_c2   evere  evvero          bevere
SFX V_c2   evere  errò            bevere
SFX V_c2   evere  errai           bevere
SFX V_c2   evere  errà            bevere
SFX V_c2   evere  erremo          bevere
SFX V_c2   evere  errete          bevere
SFX V_c2   evere  erranno         bevere
SFX V_c2   evere  errei           bevere
SFX V_c2   evere  erresti         bevere
SFX V_c2   evere  errebbe         bevere
SFX V_c2   evere  erremmo         bevere
SFX V_c2   evere  erreste         bevere
SFX V_c2   evere  errebbero       bevere
SFX V_c2   overe  evo             dovere
SFX V_c2   overe  ebbo            dovere
SFX V_c2   overe  evi             dovere
SFX V_c2   overe  eve             dovere
SFX V_c2   overe  obbiamo         dovere
SFX V_c2   overe  evono           dovere
SFX V_c2   overe  ebbono          dovere
SFX V_c2   overe  ovrò            dovere
SFX V_c2   overe  ovrai           dovere
SFX V_c2   overe  ovrà            dovere
SFX V_c2   overe  ovremo          dovere
SFX V_c2   overe  ovrete          dovere
SFX V_c2   overe  ovranno         dovere
SFX V_c2   overe  ovrei           dovere
SFX V_c2   overe  ovresti         dovere
SFX V_c2   overe  ovrebbe         dovere
SFX V_c2   overe  ovremmo         dovere
SFX V_c2   overe  ovreste         dovere
SFX V_c2   overe  ovrebbero       dovere
SFX V_c2   overe  ebba            dovere
SFX V_c2   overe  eva             dovere
SFX V_c2   overe  obbiate         dovere
SFX V_c2   overe  ebbano          dovere
SFX V_c2   overe  evano           dovere
SFX V_c2   overe  ovvi           piovere
SFX V_c2   overe  ovve           piovere
SFX V_c2   overe  ovvero         piovere
SFX V_c3     ire  icere/V           dire
SFX V_c3       e    /e             ire
SFX V_c3     ire    o      [^cghln]ire
SFX V_c3     ire    o      [^g][ln]ire
SFX V_c3     ire isco
SFX V_c3     ire    i/e    [^cghln]ire
SFX V_c3     ire    i/e    [^g][ln]ire
SFX V_c3     ire isci/e
SFX V_c3     ire    e      [^cghln]ire
SFX V_c3     ire    e      [^g][ln]ire
SFX V_c3     ire isce
SFX V_c3     ire    iamo/e
SFX V_c3     ire    ite/e
SFX V_c3     ire    ono    [^cghln]ire
SFX V_c3     ire    ono    [^g][ln]ire
SFX V_c3     ire iscono
SFX V_c3     ire    ivo
SFX V_c3     ire    ivi
SFX V_c3     ire    iva
SFX V_c3     ire    ivamo
SFX V_c3     ire    ivate
SFX V_c3     ire    ivano
SFX V_c3     ire    ii
SFX V_c3     ire    isti
SFX V_c3     ire    ì
SFX V_c3     ire    immo
SFX V_c3     ire    iste
SFX V_c3     ire    irono
SFX V_c3     ire    irò
SFX V_c3     ire    irai
SFX V_c3     ire    irà
SFX V_c3     ire    iremo
SFX V_c3     ire    irete
SFX V_c3     ire    iranno
SFX V_c3     ire    irei
SFX V_c3     ire    iresti
SFX V_c3     ire    irebbe
SFX V_c3     ire    iremmo
SFX V_c3     ire    ireste
SFX V_c3     ire    irebbero
SFX V_c3     ire    a      [^cghln]ire
SFX V_c3     ire    a      [^g][ln]ire
SFX V_c3     ire isca
SFX V_c3     ire    iate
SFX V_c3     ire    ano    [^cghln]ire
SFX V_c3     ire    ano    [^g][ln]ire
SFX V_c3     ire iscano
SFX V_c3     ire    issi
SFX V_c3     ire    isse
SFX V_c3     ire    issimo
SFX V_c3     ire    issero
SFX V_c3     ire    ente/e
SFX V_c3     ire    enti/e
SFX V_c3     ire    ito/e
SFX V_c3     ire    ita/e
SFX V_c3     ire    iti/e
SFX V_c3   ucire  ucio         [cr]ucire
SFX V_c3   ucire  uci/e        [cr]ucire
SFX V_c3   ucire  uce          [cr]ucire
SFX V_c3   ucire  uciono       [cr]ucire
SFX V_c3   ucire  ucia         [cr]ucire
SFX V_c3   ucire  uciano       [cr]ucire
SFX V_c3   udire  odo              udire
SFX V_c3   udire  odi/e            udire
SFX V_c3   udire  ode              udire
SFX V_c3   udire  odono            udire
SFX V_c3   udire  udrò             udire
SFX V_c3   udire  udrai            udire
SFX V_c3   udire  udrà             udire
SFX V_c3   udire  udremo           udire
SFX V_c3   udire  udrete           udire
SFX V_c3   udire  udranno          udire
SFX V_c3   udire  udrei            udire
SFX V_c3   udire  udresti          udire
SFX V_c3   udire  udrebbe          udire
SFX V_c3   udire  udremmo          udire
SFX V_c3   udire  udreste          udire
SFX V_c3   udire  udrebbero        udire
SFX V_c3   udire  oda              udire
SFX V_c3   udire  odano            udire
SFX V_c3  uggire  uggo           fuggire
SFX V_c3  uggire  uggi/e         fuggire
SFX V_c3  uggire  ugge           fuggire
SFX V_c3  uggire  uggono         fuggire
SFX V_c3  uggire  ugga           fuggire
SFX V_c3  uggire  uggano         fuggire
SFX V_c3  uscire  esco            uscire
SFX V_c3  uscire  esci/e          uscire
SFX V_c3  uscire  esce            uscire
SFX V_c3  uscire  escono          uscire
SFX V_c3  uscire  esca            uscire
SFX V_c3  uscire  escano          uscire
SFX V_c3  ellire  olto/e         pellire
SFX V_c3  ellire  olta/e         pellire
SFX V_c3  ellire  olti/e         pellire
SFX V_c3  ellire  olte/e         pellire
SFX V_c3   enire  engo            venire
SFX V_c3   enire  ieni/e          venire
SFX V_c3   enire  iene            venire
SFX V_c3   enire  engono          venire
SFX V_c3   enire  enni            venire
SFX V_c3   enire  enne            venire
SFX V_c3   enire  ennero          venire
SFX V_c3   enire  errò            venire
SFX V_c3   enire  errai           venire
SFX V_c3   enire  errà            venire
SFX V_c3   enire  erremo          venire
SFX V_c3   enire  errete          venire
SFX V_c3   enire  erranno         venire
SFX V_c3   enire  errei           venire
SFX V_c3   enire  erresti         venire
SFX V_c3   enire  errebbe         venire
SFX V_c3   enire  erremmo         venire
SFX V_c3   enire  erreste         venire
SFX V_c3   enire  errebbero       venire
SFX V_c3   enire  enga            venire
SFX V_c3   enire  engano          venire
SFX V_c3   enire  enuto/e         venire
SFX V_c3   enire  enuta/e         venire
SFX V_c3   enire  enuti/e         venire
SFX V_c3   enire  enute/e         venire
SFX V_c3  entire  enziente/e     sentire
SFX V_c3  entire  enzienti/e     sentire
SFX V_c3   arire  aio             parire
SFX V_c3   arire  aiono           parire
SFX V_c3   arire  arvi            parire
SFX V_c3   arire  arve            parire
SFX V_c3   arire  arvero          parire
SFX V_c3   arire  arsero          parire
SFX V_c3   arire  arrò            parire
SFX V_c3   arire  arrai           parire
SFX V_c3   arire  arrà            parire
SFX V_c3   arire  arremo          parire
SFX V_c3   arire  arrete          parire
SFX V_c3   arire  arranno         parire
SFX V_c3   arire  arrei           parire
SFX V_c3   arire  arresti         parire
SFX V_c3   arire  arrebbe         parire
SFX V_c3   arire  arremmo         parire
SFX V_c3   arire  arreste         parire
SFX V_c3   arire  arrebbero       parire
SFX V_c3   arire  aia             parire
SFX V_c3   arire  aiano           parire
SFX V_c3   arire  arso/e          parire
SFX V_c3   arire  arsa/e          parire
SFX V_c3   arire  arsi/e          parire
SFX V_c3   arire  arse/e          parire
SFX V_c3  ertire  ersero         vertire
SFX V_c3  ertire  erso/e         vertire
SFX V_c3  ertire  ersa/e         vertire
SFX V_c3  ertire  ersi/e         vertire
SFX V_c3  ertire  erse/e         vertire
SFX V_c3   erire  ersi            ferire
SFX V_c3   erire  erse            ferire
SFX V_c3   erire  ersero          ferire
SFX V_c3   erire  erto/e          ferire
SFX V_c3   erire  erta/e          ferire
SFX V_c3   erire  erti/e          ferire
SFX V_c3   erire  erte/e          ferire
SFX V_c3    rire  ersi      [^s][fp]rire
SFX V_c3    rire  erse      [^s][fp]rire
SFX V_c3    rire  ersero    [^s][fp]rire
SFX V_c3    rire  erto/e    [^s][fp]rire
SFX V_c3    rire  erta/e    [^s][fp]rire
SFX V_c3    rire  erti/e    [^s][fp]rire
SFX V_c3    rire  erte/e    [^s][fp]rire
SFX V_c3   orire  uoio            morire
SFX V_c3   orire  uori/e          morire
SFX V_c3   orire  uore            morire
SFX V_c3   orire  uoiono          morire
SFX V_c3   orire  orrò            morire
SFX V_c3   orire  orrai           morire
SFX V_c3   orire  orrà            morire
SFX V_c3   orire  orremo          morire
SFX V_c3   orire  orrete          morire
SFX V_c3   orire  orranno         morire
SFX V_c3   orire  orrei           morire
SFX V_c3   orire  orresti         morire
SFX V_c3   orire  orrebbe         morire
SFX V_c3   orire  orremmo         morire
SFX V_c3   orire  orreste         morire
SFX V_c3   orire  orrebbero       morire
SFX V_c3   orire  uoia            morire
SFX V_c3   orire  uoiano          morire
SFX V_c3   orire  orto/e          morire
SFX V_c3   orire  orta/e          morire
SFX V_c3   orire  orti/e          morire
SFX V_c3   orire  orte/e          morire
SFX V_n    re   mento     [ai]re
SFX V_n   ere  imento    [^i]ere
SFX V_n  iere  imento
SFX V_n    re   zione [^z][ai]re
SFX V_n   ere  izione   [^iz]ere
SFX V_n  iere  izione
SFX V_n  dere   sione   [^n]dere
SFX V_n  gere   zione   [^g]gere
SFX V_n ggere   zione
SFX V_n   rre   zione     trarre
SFX V_n   rre   zione      durre
SFX V_n   rre sizione      porre
SFX V_n   ellere   ulsione    [pv]ellere
SFX V_n   olvere  oluzione    [sv]olvere
SFX V_n   andere   ansione       pandere
SFX V_n   endere   ensione [cfprt]endere
SFX V_n    imere   enzione     [ds]imere
SFX V_n    enere   enzione        tenere
SFX V_n   incere   inzione       vincere
SFX V_n  inguere   inzione      tinguere
SFX V_n    umere   unzione        sumere
SFX V_n   ergere   ersione  [mptv]ergere
SFX V_n   ertere   ersione       vertere
SFX V_n   orcere   orsione       torcere
SFX V_n   orgere urrezione       sorgere
SFX V_n    edere   essione        cedere
SFX V_n    imere   essione       primere
SFX V_n   ettere   essione    [ln]ettere
SFX V_n   ettere   issione       mettere
SFX V_n   indere   issione      scindere
SFX V_n   iggere   issione       figgere
SFX V_n   uotere   ossione       cuotere
